Utah statutes.
11-32-17.   Anticipation of taxes to be considered in fixing tax rate.
To the extent that a participant member uses the provisions of this chapter to
anticipate the collection of delinquent taxes in any given year, such
participant member shall take such anticipation into account in fixing its tax
rate for the following year.
